test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-jeqllw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - jeʼllõ: # Verb 'to live' - full paradigm
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Inf: [jeʼllõ, jellõ]
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Ger: [jeʼllõs, jellõs]
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Sup: jelām
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Sup+Ine: jelāmõs
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Sup+Ela: jelāmõst
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Sup+Tra: jelāmõks
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Sup+Abe: jelāmõt
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jelāb
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jelād
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jelāb
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jelāt
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jelābõd
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: jelīz
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [jelīzt, jelīztõ]
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [jelīzt, jelīztõ]
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [jeʼl, jel]
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Cond+Sg3: jelāks
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: jelā
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [jeʼllõ, jellõ]
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: jelāgid
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Jus+Sg3: jelāg
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+QuoSg3: jelāji
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+ActPrfPrc: [jeʼllõn, jellõn]
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+PssPrfPrc: [jeʼldõd, jeldõd]
